Florida, session 2026, SB2508.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsection (18) of section 318.18, Florida 16 Statutes, is amended to read: 17 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 18 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 19 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 20 (18)âIn addition to any penalties imposed, a surcharge of 21 $3 must be paid for all criminal offenses listed in s. 318.17 22 and for all noncriminal moving traffic violations under chapter 23 316. Revenue from the surcharge shall be remitted to the 24 Department of Revenue and deposited quarterly into the State 25 Agency Law Enforcement Radio System Trust Fund of the Department 26 of Management Services for the state agency law enforcement 27 radio system, as described in s. 282.709, and to provide 28 technical assistance to state agencies and local law enforcement 29 agencies with their statewide systems of regional law 30 enforcement communications, as described in s. 282.7101. This 31 subsection expires July 1, 2026. The Department of Management 32 Services may retain funds sufficient to recover the costs and 33 expenses incurred for managing, administering, and overseeing 34 the Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System, and providing 35 technical assistance to state agencies and local law enforcement 36 agencies with their statewide systems of regional law 37 enforcement communications. The Department of Management 38 Services working in conjunction with the Joint Task Force on 39 State Agency Law Enforcement Communications shall determine and 40 direct the purposes for which these funds are used to enhance 41 and improve the radio system. 42 Section 2.âSubsection (17) of section 318.21, Florida 43 Statutes, is amended to read: 44 318.21âDisposition of civil penalties by county courts.âAll 45 civil penalties received by a county court pursuant to the 46 provisions of this chapter shall be distributed and paid monthly 47 as follows: 48 (17)âNotwithstanding subsections (1) and (2), the proceeds 49 from the administrative fee imposed under s. 318.18(18) shall be 50 distributed as provided in that subsection. This subsection 51 expires July 1, 2026. 52 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.